Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Penalties

230.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates KRS

230.070

or KRS 230.080(3) shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who violates KRS

230.090

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates KRS

230.680

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who refuses to make any report or to turn over sums as required by KRS

230.361

to

230.373

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person failing to appear before the racing commission at the time and place specified in the summons issued pursuant to KRS 230.260(12), or refusing to testify, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. False swearing on the part of any witness shall be deemed perjury and punished as such.

A person is guilty of tampering with or interfering with a horse race when, with the intent to influence the outcome of a horse race, he uses any device, material, or substance not approved by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission on or in any participant involved in or eligible to compete in a horse race to be viewed by the public.

Any person who, while outside the Commonwealth and with intent to influence the outcome of a horse race contested within the Commonwealth, tampers with or interferes with any equine participant involved in or eligible to compete in a horse race in the Commonwealth is guilty of tampering with or interfering with a horse race.

Tampering with or interfering with a horse race is a Class C felony.

History.

1326 to 1328, 3990a-4: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 173, § 10; 1960, ch. 184, § 17; 1966, ch. 255, § 209; 1978, ch. 307, § 15, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 224, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 214, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 109, § 37, effective March 30, 1992; 1992, ch. 463, § 26, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 342, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 191, § 45, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 10, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 494, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/25/2009). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(e) and (h), the Reviser of Statutes has changed a reference to “KRS 230.260(13)” to read “KRS 230.260(12),” in order to correct an error resulting from the renumbering of subsections in 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 80, sec. 3.

(7/14/2000). KRS

230.680

, referenced in subsection (3) of this statute, was repealed by 1992 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 40, effective March 20, 1992.